District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.35

Rulemaking; enforcement.

(a)

The Mayor, or his designee, may promulgate, amend, or repeal rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter, including the manner and amount of any fares, fees, or fines, pursuant to the Mayor’s authority under subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for an infraction of any rule promulgated under subsection (a) of this section pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11e
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-225, § 3(e), 53 DCR 10232
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(d) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-134, June 16, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5762).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(d) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-321, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2557).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(e) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-3, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1439).
Delegation of Authority-Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2002, see Mayor’s Order 2009-43, March 26, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6781).